Illinois, session 104th, SB2084.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Governmental Ethics Act is amended 5by adding Section 3A-55 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 420/3A-55 new)7    Sec. 3A-55. Exemption. Members of the Fairness in Property 8Tax Foreclosure Task Force are, in their capacity as members 9of the Fairness in Property Tax Foreclosure Task Force, exempt 10from any training, disclosure, or filing requirements under 11this Act. 12    Section 10. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act 13is amended by adding Section 99-15 as follows: 14    (5 ILCS 430/99-15 new)15    Sec. 99-15. Exemption. The Fairness in Property Tax 16Foreclosure Task Force are, in their capacity as members of 17the Fairness in Property Tax Foreclosure Task Force, exempt 18from any training, disclosure, or filing requirements under 19this Act. 20    Section 15. The Illinois Housing Development Act is   SB2084- 2 -LRB104 03815 HLH 13839 b1amended by adding Section 36 as follows: 2    (20 ILCS 3805/36 new)3    Sec. 36. The Fairness in Property Tax Foreclosure Task 4Force. 5    (a) The General Assembly finds that:6        (1) homeownership has long been viewed as a foundation 7    for building wealth;8        (2) for many Illinoisans, the equity in their home is 9    the single greatest asset they have;10        (3) the loss of owner-occupied homes following the 11    annual tax sale results in a loss of home equity for 12    impacted households and negatively impacts the ability of 13    those households to build generational wealth; and14        (4) the redemption process in Illinois can often be 15    complicated, confusing, and burdensome, resulting in the 16    loss of homeownership as well as the equity the homeowner 17    built up over time.18    (b) The Fairness in Property Tax Foreclosure Task Force is 19hereby created. The Task Force shall consist of the following 20members:21        (1) one member, who shall serve as co-chairperson of 22    the Task Force, appointed by the President of the Senate;23        (2) one member, who shall serve as co-chairperson of 24    the Task Force, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 25    Representatives;  SB2084- 3 -LRB104 03815 HLH 13839 b1        (3) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 2    Senate;3        (4) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 4    House of Representatives;5        (5) the Attorney General or his or her designee;6        (6) one member appointed by the Governor from a 7    statewide organization representing the interests of 8    assessors;9        (7) one member appointed by the Governor from a 10    statewide organization that represents the interests of 11    municipalities;12        (8) one member appointed by the Governor from a 13    statewide organization representing the interests of 14    realtors;15        (9) one member appointed by the Governor from a 16    statewide organization that represents commercial bankers;17        (10) one member appointed by the Governor from a 18    statewide organization that represents attorneys working 19    in the field of property title law;20        (11) one member appointed by the Governor from a 21    statewide organization that represents the interests of 22    county clerks and recorders;23        (12) one member appointed by the Governor from a 24    statewide organization that represents the interests of 25    county treasurers;26        (13) one member appointed by the Governor from a   SB2084- 4 -LRB104 03815 HLH 13839 b1    statewide organization representing the interests of 2    circuit court clerks;3        (14) one member appointed by the Governor from a 4    statewide organization representing the interests of 5    counties; 6        (15) up to 2 members, appointed by the co-chairpersons 7    of the Task Force, representing nonprofit affordable 8    housing organizations, housing counseling organizations, 9    or homeownership organizations; and10        (16) up to 3 members, appointed by the co-chairpersons 11    of the Task Force, representing taxing districts, other 12    than municipalities, that contain a significant number of 13    properties that are included in the annual tax sale.14    At the discretion of both of the co-chairpersons of the 15Task Force, additional individuals may participate as 16nonvoting members of the Task Force.17    (c) Members of the Task Force shall be appointed no later 18than 30 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 19the 104th General Assembly. If any members are not appointed 20within that 30-day period, the appointing authority shall be 21deemed to have waived the right to make that appointment. 22Vacancies in the Task Force, other than a vacancy occurring 23because of a waiver by the appointing authority under this 24subsection, shall be filled by the original appointing 25authority.26    (d) Members of the Task Force shall serve without   SB2084- 5 -LRB104 03815 HLH 13839 b1compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses 2incurred in connection with the Task Force. The Illinois 3Housing Development Authority shall provide administrative 4support to the Task Force as needed.5    (e) The members of the Task Force are, in their capacity as 6members of the Fairness in Property Tax Foreclosure Task 7Force, exempt from any training, disclosure, or filing 8requirements under the State Officials and Employees Ethics 9Act, the Illinois Governmental Ethics Act, or any other 10applicable State law or rule imposing training, disclosure, or 11filing requirements.12    (f) Once all of the members of the Task Force have been 13appointed, other than members appointed under items (15) or 14(16) of subsection (b) or members whose appointments have been 15waived under subsection (c), the Task Force shall meet not 16less than 4 times at the call of one or both of the 17co-chairpersons to carry out the duties prescribed in this 18Section. Members of the Task Force may attend those meetings 19virtually.20    (g) The Task Force shall study and make recommendations 21concerning issues associated with property foreclosures due to 22failure of the owner to pay property taxes. Those issues shall 23include, but shall not be limited to:24        (1) the recent decision of the United States Supreme 25    Court in Tyler v. Hennepin County, 598 U.S. 631, regarding 26    the retention of excess revenue by a government entity   SB2084- 6 -LRB104 03815 HLH 13839 b1    after the sale of property acquired following a tax sale 2    and foreclosure;3        (2) the requirements of the Illinois and United States 4    Constitutions, especially with respect to due process and 5    takings, and the impact of those provisions on the 6    property tax sale process, including the sufficiency of 7    notice requirements to delinquent taxpayers and related 8    entities, such as lienholders and mortgagees, and 9    conditions under which the holder of the tax deed or any 10    subsequent owner is or should be entitled to retain excess 11    funds acquired through the sale of property that has been 12    acquired during a tax sale;13        (3) the role of land bank authorities, mortgage 14    holders, and other lienholders and the rights of each in 15    the tax sale and foreclosure process;16        (4) whether the tax lien foreclosure process is or 17    should be the same for both residential property and 18    commercial property or whether differences are necessary 19    or desirable;20        (5) the rights of former owners, commercial lenders or 21    lienholders, and government entities when property has 22    been acquired for nonpayment of property taxes and the tax 23    deed grantee does not intend to sell the property; and24        (6) the sufficiency of any current redemption periods 25    or statutes of limitations with respect to property tax 26    sales.  SB2084- 7 -LRB104 03815 HLH 13839 b1    The recommendations of the Task Force may, but need not 2be, in the form of proposed legislation.3    (g) A report detailing the Task Force's findings, 4conclusions, and recommendations shall be filed with the 5General Assembly, in accordance with Section 3.1 of the 6General Assembly Organization Act, by no later than December 730, 2025. The Task Force is dissolved upon submission of the 8report.9    (h) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2026. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.